verbo/irregulares/irregulares_1.lexc
LEXICON Root

Irregulares_1;

LEXICON Irregulares_1

pensar #; 
perder #;
empezar #;
entender #;
negarse #; 
sentarse #; 
despertar #; 
atravesar #; 
perder #; 
encender #; 
calentar #;
recomendar #; 
merendar #;
descender #; 
encerrar #; 
apretar #; 
atender #;
extenderse #; 
defender #;
